Arkansas, session 2025, SB452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4, Chapter 75, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 15 — Contracts Involving Maintenance or Recycling of Wind Turbines

4-75-1501. Purpose.
The purpose of this subchapter is to ensure that a contract between an
entity and a property owner contains a provision addressing the maintenance
and recycling of a wind turbine.

4-75-1502. Definitions.
(a) As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Maintenance" means the machinery or equipment used to keep
an existing wind turbine in a condition that approaches or equates to the
wind turbine's original condition;
(2) "Recycling" means the collection, decontamination, and
return of materials used to construct, maintain, and deconstruct a wind
*ANS247*
03/13/2025 9:40:59 AM ANS247

SB452
turbine; and
(3)(A) "Wind turbine" means an apparatus over two hundred feet
(200') that is used to convert the kinetic energy of wind into electricity.
(B) "Wind turbine" includes a turbine, blade, tower, base,
and pad transformer, if any.

4-75-1503. Maintenance and recycling wind turbines.
(a) On and after January 1, 2026, a contract between an entity and an
owner of real property for the installation of a wind turbine on real
property in this state is required to include a provision that addresses:
(1) The proper maintenance and recycling of a wind turbine; and
(2) The disposition of the wind turbine if the entity installing
or maintaining the wind turbine is dissolved, declares bankruptcy, or is no
longer able to maintain the wind turbine.
(b) An entity shall agree to assume joint and several liability for
any damages, interest, and penalties that accrue on the part of the owner of
real property for failure to properly maintain and recycle a wind turbine or
to dispose of the wind turbine if the entity is dissolved, declares
bankruptcy, or is no longer able to maintain the wind turbine as part of the
consideration for the contract described under subsection (a) of this
section.

4-75-1504. Enforcement.
(a) A violation of this subchapter shall constitute an unfair or
deceptive act or practice as defined by the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, §
4-88-101 et seq.
(b) All remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the Attorney
General under the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq., shall be
available to the Attorney General for the enforcement of this subchapter.







03/13/2025 9:40:59 AM ANS247